Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1943.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1423 of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended to read:Section 1423. [Automatic] Automated External Defibrillators.--(a) The department shall establish an [automatic] automated external defibrillator program to assist school entities and nonpublic schools in making [automatic] automated external defibrillators available in school buildings.(b) On a biennial basis, the department, in consultation 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 with the Department of General Services and the Department of Health, shall issue an invitation to bid for the cost of [automatic] automated external defibrillators and other equipment and supplies necessary for the proper operation of the device. The department shall accept the bid of the lowest responsible bidder and permit any school entity or nonpublic school to purchase the devices at the contract bid price. The department may purchase [automatic] automated external defibrillators from any funds appropriated pursuant to subsection (k) for distribution to school entities and nonpublic schools.(c) To be eligible to obtain or purchase [automatic] automated external defibrillators under the program a school entity or nonpublic school must:(1) Assure that two (2) or more persons assigned to the location where the [automatic] automated external defibrillator will be primarily housed are trained as required in subsection (d).(2) Ensure that the device will be secured in a safe and readily accessible location and agree to properly maintain and test the device according to the manufacturer's operational guidelines.[(3) Submit a valid prescription for the device from a licensed medical practitioner in this Commonwealth.](4) Agree to provide the training required by subsection (d).(d) School personnel who are expected to use the [automatic] automated external defibrillator shall complete training in cardiopulmonary resuscitation and in the use of an [automatic] automated external defibrillator provided by the American Heart 20250HB1943PN2452 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Association, the American Red Cross or through an equivalent course of instruction approved by the Department of Health.(e) A school entity may include the training required by subsection (d) in its continuing professional education plan submitted to the department under section 1205.1.(f) The provisions of 42 Pa.C.S. § 8331.2 (relating to good Samaritan civil immunity for use of [automatic] automated external defibrillator) shall apply to school employes who render care with an [automatic] automated external defibrillator.(g) From funds appropriated for this purpose or from other funds available, the department may assist school entities and nonpublic schools that are not equipped with [automatic] automated external defibrillators by providing a discount from the contract bid price obtained under subsection (b) or by providing [automatic] automated external defibrillators obtained under subsection (b).(g.1) The purchase of an [automatic] automated external defibrillator shall be considered an allowable use of Pennsylvania Accountability Grants under section 2599.2(b).(g.2) The purchase of [automatic] automated external defibrillators shall be considered an innovative educational program under Article XVII-F of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the "Tax Reform Code of 1971."(h) (Reserved).(i) Not later than June 30, 2014, and each year thereafter, each school entity shall make a report to the department detailing the number, condition, age and placement of [automatic] automated external defibrillators in each school building. After the initial report is made, a school entity may 20250HB1943PN2452 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 report this information as part of the annual report required by the Commonwealth under section 2505.1 to receive State reimbursement for health services.(i.1) A nonpublic school that participates in the [automatic] automated external defibrillator program under subsection (b) or (g) shall be subject to the reporting required under subsection (i).(i.2) The department shall annually publish a report on its publicly accessible Internet website no later than December 31, 2014, and each year thereafter. The report shall contain the following information:(1) The total number of [automatic] automated external defibrillators by school entity and nonpublic school.(2) The number of school buildings by school entity and nonpublic school that are equipped with [automatic] automated external defibrillators.(3) The number of school buildings by school entity and nonpublic school that are not equipped with [automatic] automated external defibrillators.(j) The department may adopt guidelines as necessary to administer this section.(k) The General Assembly may appropriate funds to carry out the provisions of this section.(l) As used in this section--["Automatic] "Automated external defibrillator" means a portable device that uses electric shock to restore a stable heart rhythm to an individual in cardiac arrest."Department" means the Department of Education of the Commonwealth."Nonpublic school" means a nonprofit school, other than a 20250HB1943PN2452 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 public school within this Commonwealth, wherein a resident of this Commonwealth may legally fulfill the compulsory school attendance requirements of this act and which meets the applicable requirements of Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 (Public Law 88-352, 78 Stat. 241)."School building" means a building owned by or under the control of a school entity or nonpublic school where classes are taught or extracurricular activities are conducted on a regular basis."School entity" means an area career and technical school, a charter school, a cyber charter school, an intermediate unit or a school district."Secretary" means the Secretary of Education of the Commonwealth.Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1423.1. Automated External Defibrillators and Training.--( a) (1) Each school entity shall place an automated external defibrillator in an easily accessible, centralized location in each occupied school building or facility where school-sponsored activities or athletic activities occur.(2) A minimum of four school entity employes trained in the use of an automated external defibrillator must be present within one thousand (1,000) feet of the location of an automated external defibrillator throughout the school day.(3) A minimum of two school entity employes or volunteers trained in the use of an automated external defibrillator must be present within two hundred (200) yards of an automated external defibrillator at each school-sponsored or school-approved athletic activity.(4) The following school entity employes shall participate, 20250HB1943PN2452 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 on an annual basis, in training on the use of an automated external defibrillator provided by the American Heart Association, the American Red Cross or through an equivalent course of instruction approved by the Department of Health:(i) The school nurse and at least one additional member of the nursing staff.(ii) The school principal and at least one additional member of school administration.(iii) A physical education teacher.(iv) The head coach of each athletic team and at least one additional member of the coaching staff.(v) The school resource officer or any other school security personnel.(vi) The director of athletic activities or a designee.(vii) Any other employe as assigned by the school entity in compliance with this section.(b) Each school entity shall perform an annual inspection to ensure that each automated external defibrillator is functional according to manufacturer's guidelines.(c) On an annual basis, each school entity shall report to the Department of Education and Department of Health the following information:(1) The number of automated external defibrillators placed in school buildings and facilities.(2) The names of employes trained in the use of automated external defibrillators and proof of certification or successful completion of training.(3) Any other information requested by the Department of Education or Department of Health relating to automated external defibrillator availability and training.20250HB1943PN2452 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (d) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection:"Athletic activity." Any of the following:(1) Interscholastic athletics as defined in section 1602-A.(2) An athletic contest or competition, other than interscholastic athletics, that is sponsored by or associated with a school entity, including cheerleading, club-sponsored sports activities or sports activities sponsored by school-affiliated organizations.(3) Noncompetitive cheerleading that is sponsored by or associated with a school entity.(4) Practices, interschool practices and scrimmages for an activity listed under clause (1), (2) or (3)."Automated external defibrillator." As defined in section 1423."School building or facility." A building or facility owned by or under the control of a school entity or, in the case of a cyber charter school, at each location under the cyber charter school's jurisdiction, where classes are taught or extracurricular activities are conducted on a regular basis."School entity." A public school, charter school, cyber charter school, private school, nonpublic school, intermediate unit or area career and technical school."School resource officer" or "school security personnel." As defined in section 1301-C."School-sponsored activities." Assemblies, graduation ceremonies, athletic activities, extracurricular activities, clubs, groups, teams or any activities sponsored, held or approved by the school entity whether held during normal school hours or otherwise.20250HB1943PN2452 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 3. Section 1425(a)(1) introductory paragraph, (i) and (iii) and (d)(1) of the act are amended to read:Section 1425. Sudden Cardiac Arrest and Electrocardiogram Testing.--(a) (1) The department and the Department of Education shall develop and post on their publicly accessible Internet websites guidelines and other relevant materials to inform and educate students participating in or desiring to participate in an athletic activity, their parents or guardians and their coaches about:(i) The nature and warning signs of sudden cardiac arrest, including the risks associated with continuing to play or practice after experiencing one (1) or more symptoms of sudden cardiac arrest, including fainting, difficulty breathing, shortness of breath, chest pains, dizziness and abnormal racing heart rate.* * *(iii) The [option] requirement to request, from the family's medical provider or a cardiologist, the administration of an electrocardiogram, in addition to the comprehensive initial participation physical examination, at a cost to be incurred by the parent or guardian.* * *(d) (1) Once each school year, a coach of an athletic activity shall complete [the sudden cardiac arrest training course] training in sudden cardiac arrest and the use of an automated external defibrillator offered by a provider approved by the department.* * *Section 4. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1426. Electrocardiogram Testing for Interscholastic 20250HB1943PN2452 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Athletics.--(a) Except as provided under subsection (f), the following students shall receive an electrocardiogram:(1) For the 2026-2027 school year, each student who participates in interscholastic athletics or is a candidate for an interscholastic athletic team.(2) For the 2027-2028 school year and each school year thereafter, each student in grades six through eight who, for the first time, participates in interscholastic athletics or is a candidate for an interscholastic athletic team.(3) For the 2027-2028 school year and each school year thereafter, each student in grades nine through twelve who, for the first time since entering grade nine, participates in interscholastic athletics or is a candidate for an interscholastic athletic team.(b) For a student under subsection (a), the parent or legal guardian shall provide to the school entity one of the following:(1) Certification from the family's primary care provider, a cardiologist or another health care provider with specialized training in cardiovascular screening techniques and protocols, as approved by the Department of Health, that the student received electrocardiogram testing and does not exhibit signs, symptoms or risk factors of sudden cardiac arrest.(2) A written notice under subsection (f).(c) If a student fails an electrocardiogram, the student shall obtain a comprehensive cardiovascular examination by a cardiologist within one hundred twenty (120) days or before the start of the next school year, whichever occurs first. The notice submitted to the school entity shall include a form completed by the examining cardiologist.20250HB1943PN2452 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (d) Except as provided under subsection (f), a student who fails to submit the certification required under subsection (b)(1) or to complete the examination required under subsection (c) shall be ineligible to participate in interscholastic athletics until the required documentation is provided to the school entity.(e) A school entity shall not be required to arrange comprehensive cardiovascular examinations and shall not be financially responsible for the treatment of a student who fails an electrocardiogram.(f) A student may participate in interscholastic athletics or be a candidate for an interscholastic athletic team if the student's parent or legal guardian objects in writing to the student receiving an electrocardiogram on the ground that the electrocardiogram is contrary to the parent's or legal guardian's religious tenets or practices. If an objection is submitted under this subsection, no liability shall arise for a person or entity that would otherwise rely on electrocardiogram results for damages that arise directly from the student's participation in interscholastic athletics where an undisclosed medical condition that would have been revealed by an electrocardiogram is a proximate cause of the injury or death. The parent or legal guardian shall provide a written release of liability prepared by an attorney in good standing and licensed to practice law in this Commonwealth. The parent or legal guardian may also submit a written recommendation from the student's primary care provider, a cardiologist or another health care provider with specialized training in cardiovascular screening techniques and protocols, as approved by the Department of Health, stating that the student does not require 20250HB1943PN2452 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 an electrocardiogram.(g) As used in this section, the term "interscholastic athletics" means athletic contests or competitions conducted between or among a school district, intermediate unit, area career and technical school, charter school, cyber charter school, regional charter school or nonpublic school entity.Section 5. Section 1528(c)(1) of the act is amended and the subsection is amended by adding clauses to read:Section 1528. Cardiopulmonary Resuscitation Education.--* * *(c) (1) [A] Through the 2025-2026 school year, a school entity that offers instruction in CPR may utilize the model curriculum developed under subsections (a) and (b) or develop the school entity's own curriculum in accordance with academic standards and consistent with guidelines developed under subsections (a) and (b). A school entity may utilize appropriate publicly or privately available materials, personnel and other resources in developing and implementing this instruction, subject to the requirements of section 111 and 23 Pa.C.S. § 6344 (relating to employees having contact with children; adoptive and foster parents).* * *(3) Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, a school entity shall provide instruction in CPR for all students in grade nine and grade eleven. The instruction shall be based on a one-hour, nationally recognized program that uses the most current evidence-based emergency cardiovascular care guidelines and shall include practice of the psychomotor skills associated with performing cardiopulmonary resuscitation and using an automated external defibrillator if the school entity has the 20250HB1943PN2452 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 necessary equipment. A school entity may utilize public or private partnerships to provide training or funding.(4) Beginning with the 2027-2028 school year, a student may not graduate from a high school unless the student has successfully completed instruction in CPR consistent with this section.* * *Section 6. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1943PN2452 - 12 - 12345678